Maryland, session 2026, HB1528.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–137.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “EXTRACURRICULAR ACTIVITY” MEANS ATHLETICS,
INTERSCHOLASTIC ATHLETICS, OR ANOTHER ACTIVITY:
(1) IN WHICH A STUDENT MAY PARTICIPATE OUTSIDE OF REGULAR
SCHOOL HOURS; AND
(2) FOR WHICH A STUDENT DOES NOT EARN ACADEMIC CREDIT.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1528*

HOUSE BILL 1528
(B) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (D) OF THIS SECTION, A PUBLIC
SCHOOL MAY ALLOW A STUDENT WHO IS NOT ENROLLED IN THE SCHOOL TO
PARTICIPATE IN AN EXTRACURRICULAR ACTIVITY SPONSORED BY THE SCHOOL TO
THE SAME EXTENT THAT A STUDENT WHO IS ENROLLED IN THE SCHOOL MAY
PARTICIPATE IN THE EXTRACURRICULAR ACTIVITY IF THE STUDENT WHO IS NOT
ENROLLED PARTICIPATES IN A HOME INSTRUCTION PROGRAM IN ACCORDANCE
WITH COMAR GUIDELINES.
(C) A PUBLIC SCHOOL MAY ALLOW A STUDENT WHO PARTICIPATES IN A
HOME INSTRUCTION PROGRAM TO PARTICIPATE IN AN ATHLETIC
EXTRACURRICULAR ACTIVITY, INCLUDING INTERSCHOLASTIC ATHLETICS, IF THE
LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM APPROVES OF THE PARTICIPATION.
(D) A PUBLIC SCHOOL SHALL GIVE PLACEMENT PRIORITY TO A STUDENT
ENROLLED IN THE PUBLIC SCHOOL SPONSORING THE EXTRACURRICULAR ACTIVITY
OVER A STUDENT WHO IS NOT ENROLLED IN THE PUBLIC SCHOOL IF THERE ARE A
LIMITED NUMBER OF SPACES AVAILABLE FOR STUDENTS IN THE EXTRACURRICULAR
ACTIVITY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.